Montana, session 2025, SB153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 23-5-608, MCA, is amended to read:
"23-5-608. Limitation on amount of money played and value of prizes -- payment of credits in
cash -- ticket voucher expiration -- rules. (1) A video gambling machine may not allow more than $2 $4 to be
played on a game or award free games or credits in excess of $800 $1,199 a game.
(2) A licensee shall pay in cash all credits owed to a player as shown on a valid ticket voucher.
(3) The department may establish by rule a reasonable time period during which a player shall
present a valid ticket voucher to the licensee for payment before the voucher may be considered expired and
invalid."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Applicability. [This act] applies to video gambling machine games
placed into operation on or after January 1, 2026.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 153